Illinois, session 104th, HB4322.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Transportation Law of the 5Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding 6Section 2705-628 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2705/2705-628 new)8    Sec. 2705-628. Student loan repayment assistance for 9engineers. The Department shall provide higher education 10student loan repayment assistance in the form of an annual 11after-tax bonus in an amount to be determined by the 12Department, for not more than 5 years, to any engineer 13employed by the Department, subject to the following:14        (1) the engineer is a graduate of a community college, 15    college, or university located in this State; 16        (2) the engineer provides documentation to the 17    Department of the repayment of higher education student 18    loans taken to attend a community college, college, or 19    university located in this State; 20        (3) the engineer remains in the employ of the 21    Department for at least 5 years; and 22        (4) if the engineer leaves the employ of the 23    Department prior to serving 5 years, the engineer must   HB4322- 2 -LRB104 17006 LNS 30421 b1    return all bonuses made to the engineer by the Department 2    pursuant to this Section.  3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.